Illinois, session 104th, SB1354.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Tax 5Increment Financing and Zoning Ethics and Political 6Contributions Prohibition Act. 7    Section 5. Purpose. The purpose of this Act is to promote 8transparency, prevent conflicts of interest, and protect the 9integrity of the democratic process by prohibiting directors, 10employees, investors, and their immediate family members from 11making political contributions to candidates, political 12organizations, political action committees (PACs), or 13independent expenditure committees associated with taxing 14districts that benefit from tax increment financing (TIF) 15districts and zoning variances. This prohibition aims to 16ensure that political donations are not influenced by 17financial or other interests derived from public funds, TIFs, 18or zoning decisions. 19    Section 10. Definitions. In this Act:20    "Benefit from a TIF district" means a financial or other 21material benefit from a TIF district, including, but not 22limited to, grants, loans, tax rebates, property tax   SB1354- 2 -LRB104 07863 BDA 17909 b1abatements, infrastructure improvements, or other funding from 2a TIF district. 3    "Benefit from a zoning variance" means permission to use 4or develop land in a manner not permitted under existing 5zoning laws, which may include the ability to increase 6property value, increase development potential, or receive 7other benefits from the zoning variance decision.8    "Director" means an individual serving as a director or 9officer or in a similar position in any corporation, 10organization, or entity receiving a benefit from a TIF 11district or a benefit from a zoning variance. 12    "Employee" means an individual employed by a corporation, 13organization, or entity receiving a benefit from a TIF 14district or a benefit from a zoning variance, including 15full-time, part-time, and contractual employees. 16    "Immediate family member" means a spouse, child, parent, 17sibling, or any other relative residing in the same household 18as the individual. 19    "Independent expenditure" has the meaning ascribed to that 20term in 11 CFR 100.16.21    "Independent expenditure committee" or "IEC" means one or 22more persons that make independent expenditures or that 23collect funds from one or more persons for the purpose of 24making an independent expenditure. 25    "Investor" means any individual or entity who holds 26ownership, equity interest, or shares in a corporation,   SB1354- 3 -LRB104 07863 BDA 17909 b1organization, or entity receiving a benefit from a TIF 2district or a benefit from a zoning variance. 3    "Political action committee" or "PAC" means a tax-exempt 4organization (i) that is organized under Section 527 of the 5U.S. Internal Revenue Code, (ii) that is created primarily to 6influence the selection, nomination, election, appointment or 7defeat of candidates to federal, state or local public office, 8and (iii) that pools campaign contributions from members and 9donates those funds to campaigns for or against candidates, 10ballot initiatives, or legislation. 11    "Tax Increment Financing district" or "TIF district" means 12a designated area within a county, municipality, park 13district, library district, or school district in which 14property taxes are captured and diverted to fund improvements, 15infrastructure, and development in that area. 16    "Zoning variance" means a legal exception granted by a 17municipality or unit of local government that allows a 18property to be used or developed in a manner not otherwise 19permitted by existing zoning laws or regulations.  20    Section 15. Prohibition of political contributions. 21    (a) No director of, employee of, or investor in any 22corporation, organization, or entity that directly or 23indirectly receives a benefit from a TIF district or a benefit 24from a zoning variance or immediate family member of such a 25person shall:   SB1354- 4 -LRB104 07863 BDA 17909 b1        (1) donate or otherwise contribute money, goods, or 2    services to any candidate for public office, political 3    organization, political action committee (PAC), or 4    independent expenditure committee seeking to influence 5    elections for offices in the county, municipality, park 6    district, library district, or school district from which 7    the TIF district or zoning variance originates; or8        (2) make contributions to any political organization 9    or committee formed to influence elections for taxing 10    districts, including county, municipal, park district, 11    library district, or school district that receives taxes 12    from the same TIF district or whose jurisdiction 13    intersects with the boundaries of the TIF district or the 14    area benefiting from the zoning variance. 15    (b) No director of, employee of, or investor in any 16corporation, organization, or entity that directly or 17indirectly receives a benefit from a zoning variance or 18immediate family member of such a person shall contribute to 19any political action committee or independent expenditure 20committee for 10 years after the zoning variance is voted on by 21the corporate authorities of the municipality or unit of local 22government. This prohibition extends to any individual or 23entity that benefits, directly or indirectly, from a zoning 24variance decision by contributing to or supporting political 25action committees or independent expenditure committees that 26seek to influence elections related to the same municipality   SB1354- 5 -LRB104 07863 BDA 17909 b1or unit of local government, taxing district, or political 2office affected by the zoning variance. 3    (c) The prohibitions in this Section apply to both direct 4and indirect contributions made to candidates, political 5parties, political action committees, independent expenditure 6committees, or other political organizations that may impact 7elections at the local level within any taxing district 8associated with the TIF district or zoning variance. 9    Section 20. Disclosure of benefits from TIF districts and 10zoning variances. 11    (a) Any corporation, organization, or entity receiving a 12benefit from a TIF district or a benefit from a zoning variance 13shall be required to disclose the names of directors, 14employees, investors, and their immediate family members who 15receive the benefit from a TIF district or the benefit from a 16zoning variance to the appropriate governmental body 17administering the TIF district or zoning variance. This 18disclosure shall be made annually and shall be available for 19public inspection. 20    (b) Political organizations, candidates, political action 21committees, and independent expenditure committees shall also 22be required to maintain records and disclose contributions 23from individuals or entities that are subject to the 24provisions of this Act.   SB1354- 6 -LRB104 07863 BDA 17909 b1    Section 25. Enforcement and penalties. 2    (a) Any person found to have violated the provisions of 3this Act by making political contributions prohibited under 4Section 15 shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor and subject 5to the following penalties: 6        (1) a fine of up to $100,000 for each violation; 7        (2) an order of ineligibility to receive future 8    benefits from the relevant TIF district or zoning variance 9    for a period of up to 5 years; and10        (3) imprisonment for up to one year. 11    (b) This Act may be enforced by the State's Attorney for 12the county in which the violation occurred or the Attorney 13General. 14    Section 30. Applicability. This Act does not apply to 15persons making political contributions to candidates or 16political organizations that are unrelated to the taxing 17district from which the TIF district or zoning variance 18originates, and it does not apply to political contributions 19made at the State or federal level. 20    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect 21September 1, 2025.